Washington statutes.
RCW 36.68.620

Enlargement by inclusion of additional area—Procedure.

After a park and recreation service area has been organized, an additional area may be added by the same procedure within the proposed additional area as is provided herein for the organization of a park and recreation service area, and all electors within both the organized park and recreation service area and the proposed additional territory shall vote upon the proposition for enlargement.

[ 1973 c 65 s 2.]